Missouri, session 2026, SB875.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 208.031, to read as
follows:
208.031. The department of social services shall
establish a "Restaurant Meals Program" as part of the
supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP). Under the
restaurant meals program, households containing elderly or
disabled members, and their spouses, as defined in 7 U.S.C.
Section 2012(j), or homeless individuals, as defined in 7
U.S.C. Section 2012(l), shall have the option, in accordance
with 7 U.S.C. Section 2012(k), to redeem their SNAP benefits
at private establishments that contract with the department
to offer meals for eligible individuals at concessional
prices, subject to the provisions of 7 U.S.C. Section
2018(h).
✓